Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1209
Administrator; storage of records
and preservation duplicates; charges.

The administrator may
establish storage facilities for essential records, preservation duplicates, and other state records
and may provide for a system of charges to allocate the cost of providing
such storage among the state agencies utilizing
the storage services. The system of charges shall, as nearly as may be practical,
cover the actual costs of operating the storage facilities.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 9, p. 1390;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 6, p. 3172;

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 28;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 17.
July 19, 2012